Illinois, session 104th, SB2642.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $18,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education for costs 7associated with the implementation of a statewide master 8contract for prepackaged meals under Public Act 103-1076. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.